Utah statutes.
54-13-7.   Minimum distances for placement of structures and facilities near
main and transmission lines.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Main" has the meaning set forth in 49 C.F.R. Section 192.3;
(b)  "Minimum distance" means:
(i)  the width of a recorded easement when the width is described;
(ii)  15 feet when the width of a recorded easement is undefined; or
(iii)  for any underground facility, it means an area measured one foot
vertically and three feet horizontally from the outer surface of a main or
transmission line.
(c)  "Transmission line" has the meaning set forth in 49 C.F.R. Section 192.3;
and
(d)  "Underground facility" has the meaning set forth in Section 54-8a-2.
(2) (a)  After April 30, 1995, a building or structure requiring slab support
or footings, or an underground facility may not be placed within the minimum
distance of a main or transmission line.
(b)  Subsection (2)(a) does not apply if:
(i)  the building or structure is used for public or railroad transportation,
natural gas pipeline purposes, or by a public utility subject to the
jurisdiction or regulation of the Public Service Commission;
(ii)  in order to receive natural gas service, the building or structure must
be located within the minimum distance of the pipeline;
(iii)  the owner or operator of the main or transmission line has been
notified prior to construction or placement pursuant to Section 54-8a-4 and
has given written permission; or
(iv)  the commission by rule exempts such action from the provisions of
Subsection (2)(a).
(3)  An owner or operator of a main or transmission line may obtain a
mandatory injunction from the district court of the judicial district in which
the main or transmission line is located against any person who violates
Subsection (2).
(4)  The penalties specified in Title 54, Chapter 7, Hearings, Practice and
Procedure, and in Section 54-13-6 do not apply to a violation of this section.
